Hawaii statutes.
[§195-5] Rules and regulations. (a)
The department of land and natural resources may, subject to chapter 91, make,
amend and repeal rules and regulations having the force and effect of law,
governing the use, control and protection of the areas included within the
reserves system, provided that no rule or regulation which relates to the
permitted use of any area assigned to the reserves system shall be valid and no
use of any such area shall be permitted unless such rule or regulation or
permitted use shall have been specifically approved by the natural area
reserves system commission.

(b) The department may confer upon such of its
employees as it deems reasonable and necessary the powers to serve and execute
warrants and arrest offenders or issue citations in all matters relating to the
enforcement within the reserves system of the law and rules and regulations
applicable thereto. [L 1970, c 139, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next